nb: Kabelhusmateriale: Aluminium; Nylon; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Rustfritt stål; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Annet
de: Material der Kabelhülle: Aluminium; Nylon; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Gummi; Edelstahl; Thermoplastisches Elastomer (TPE); Sonstiges
zh-TW: 內線及外殼線組材料: 鋁; 尼龍; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡膠; 不銹鋼; 熱塑性彈性體 (TPE); 其他
sl-SI: Material kabelskega ovoja: Aluminij; Najlon; Polivinilklorid (PVC); Guma; Nerjavno jeklo; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Drugo
ja: ケーブルハウジング材質: アルミニウム; ナイロン; ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); ゴム; ステンレススチール; 熱可塑性エラストマー (TPE); その他
zh-CN: 刹车导线材料: 铝; 尼龙; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡胶; 不锈钢; 热塑性弹性体 (TPE); 其他
en: Cable housing material: Aluminum; Nylon; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Rubber; Stainless steel; Thermoplastic elastomer (TPE); Other
da: Kabelkabinettype: Aluminum; Nylon; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Rustfrit stål; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Andet
es: Material de la carcasa del cable: Aluminio; Nylon; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Goma; Acero inoxidable; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Otros
fi: Kaapelin kotelon materiaali: Alumiini; Nailon; Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Kumi; Ruostumaton teräs; Termoplastinen elastomeeri (TPE); Muu
el: Υλικό περιβλήματος καλωδίου: Αλουμίνιο; Νάιλον; Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Καουτσούκ; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Θερμοπλαστικό ελαστομερές (TPE); Άλλο
hu: Kábelburkolat anyaga: Alumínium; Nejlon; Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Gumi; Rozsdamentes acél; Hőre lágyuló elasztomer (TPE); Egyéb
it: Materiale dell'alloggiamento del cavo: Alluminio; Nylon; Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Gomma; Acciaio inossidabile; Elastomero termoplastico (TPE); Altro
pt-BR: Material da armação do cabo: Alumínio; Nylon; Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Borracha; Aço inoxidável; Elastômero termoplástico (TPE); Outro
pt-PT: Material da carcaça do cabo: Alumínio; Náilon; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Borracha; Aço inoxidável; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Outro
tr: Kablo muhafaza malzemesi: Alüminyum; Plastik; Polivinil klorür (PVC); Kauçuk; Paslanmaz çelik; Termoplastik elastomer (TPE); Diğer
cs: Materiál kabelového pouzdra: Hliník; Nylon; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Nerezová ocel; Termoplastický elastomer (TPE); Jiné
th: วัสดุสำหรับปลอกนอกสายเบรค: อะลูมิเนียม; ไนลอน; โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); ยาง; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เทอร์โมพลาสติกเอลาสโตเมอร์ (TPE); อื่นๆ
fr: Matériau du boîtier du câble: Aluminum; Nylon; Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Caoutchouc; Acier inoxydable; Élastomère thermoplastique (TPE); Autre
ru: Материал рубашки для тросов: Алюминий; Нейлон; Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Резина; Нержавеющая сталь; Термопластичный эластомер (ТПЭ); Другое
nl: Materiaal kabelbehuizing: Aluminium; Nylon; Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Rubber; Roestvrij staal; Thermoplastisch elastomeer (TPE); Andere
ro-RO: Material carcasă cablu: Aluminiu; Nailon; Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Cauciuc; Oțel inoxidabil; Elastomer termoplastic (TPE); Altele
bg-BG: Материал на корпуса на кабела: Алуминий; Найлон; Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Каучук; Неръждаема стомана; Термопластичен еластомер (TPE); Други
hr-HR: Materijal bužira: Aluminij; Najlon; Polivinil klorid (PVC); Guma; Nehrđajući čelik; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Ostalo
lt-LT: Kabelio apvalkalo medžiaga: Aliuminis; Nailonas; Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Kaučiukas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Termoplastinis elastomeras (TPE); Kita
sk-SK: Materiál káblového puzdra: Hliník; Nylon; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Termoplastický elastomér (TPE); Iné
ko: 케이블 하우징 소재: 알루미늄; 나일론; 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 고무; 스테인리스 스틸; 열가소성 엘라스토머(TPE); 기타
sv: Kabelhölje - material: Aluminium; Nylon; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Rostfritt stål; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Övrigt
pl: Materiał obudowy kabla: Aluminium; Nylon; Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Guma; Stal nierdzewna; Elastomer termoplastyczny (TPE); Inne
vi: Vật liệu vỏ cáp: Nhôm; Nylon; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Cao su; Thép không gỉ; Elastomer nhiệt dẻo (TPE); Khác